Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201645-701
Act, how cited.

Sections
45-701 to 45-754 shall be known and may be cited as the Residential Mortgage
Licensing Act.

Laws 1989, LB 272, § 4;

Laws 1995, LB 163, § 1;

Laws 2006, LB 876, § 27;

Laws 2007, LB124, § 40;

Laws 2009, LB328, § 3;

Laws 2010, LB892, § 3;

Laws 2012, LB965, § 10;

Laws 2013, LB290, § 1.